Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-3535
Prohibited acts; penalties.

Any person who performs any of the following actions is guilty of a Class II misdemeanor for the first offense and a Class I misdemeanor for the second or any subsequent offense:

(1) Practices or offers to practice geology in this state without being licensed in accordance with the Geologists Regulation Act and is not exempted by section 81-3541 or 81-3548;

(2) Knowingly and willfully employs or retains a person to practice geology in this state who is not licensed in accordance with the act and who is not exempted by section 81-3541 or 81-3548;

(3) Uses the word geologist, or any modification or derivative of such word, in its name or form of business activity except as authorized in the act;

(4) Presents or attempts to use the certificate of licensure or the seal of another person;

(5) Gives any false or forged evidence of any kind to the board or to any member of the board in obtaining or attempting to obtain a certificate of authorization;

(6) Falsely impersonates any professional geologist of like or different name;

(7) Attempts to use an expired, suspended, revoked, or nonexistent certificate of licensure or practices or offers to practice when not qualified;

(8) Falsely claims that such person is licensed or authorized under the act;

(9) Advertises any title or description tending to convey the impression that such person is a professional geologist unless the person is duly licensed under the Geologists Regulation Act; or

(10) Violates any of the provisions of the act.

Laws 1998, LB 1161, § 82;

Laws 2025, LB38, § 28.